dict/fr-moderne.aff
FLAG long
SFX iA Y 17
SFX iA dvenir dvenir/40 venir 21
SFX iA dvenir dvenant/40 venir 22
SFX iA dvenir dvenu/41 venir 72
SFX iA dvenir dvient/40 venir 29
SFX iA dvenir dviennent/20 venir 32
SFX iA dvenir dvenait/40 venir 35
SFX iA dvenir dvenaient/20 venir 38
SFX iA dvenir dvint/40 venir 41
SFX iA dvenir dvinrent/20 venir 44
SFX iA dvenir dviendra/40 venir 47
SFX iA dvenir dviendront/20 venir 50
SFX iA dvenir dviendrait/40 venir 53
SFX iA dvenir dviendraient/20 venir 56
SFX iA dvenir dvienne/40 venir 59
SFX iA dvenir dviennent/20 venir 62
SFX iA dvenir dvînt/40 venir 65
SFX iA dvenir dvinssent/20 venir 68

SFX iB Y 48
SFX iB partenir partenir/29 tenir 21
SFX iB partenir partenant/30 tenir 22
SFX iB partenir partenu/41 tenir 72
SFX iB partenir partiens/31 tenir 27
SFX iB partenir partiens/32 tenir 28
SFX iB partenir partient/32 tenir 29
SFX iB partenir partenons/33 tenir 30
SFX iB partenir partenez/34 tenir 31
SFX iB partenir partiennent/32 tenir 32
SFX iB partenir partenais/31 tenir 33
SFX iB partenir partenais/32 tenir 34
SFX iB partenir partenait/32 tenir 35
SFX iB partenir partenions/33 tenir 36
SFX iB partenir parteniez/34 tenir 37
SFX iB partenir partenaient/43 tenir 38
SFX iB partenir partins/31 tenir 39
SFX iB partenir partins/32 tenir 40
SFX iB partenir partint/32 tenir 41
SFX iB partenir partînmes/33 tenir 42
SFX iB partenir partîntes/34 tenir 43
SFX iB partenir partinrent/43 tenir 44
SFX iB partenir partiendrai/31 tenir 45
SFX iB partenir partiendras/32 tenir 46
SFX iB partenir partiendra/32 tenir 47
SFX iB partenir partiendrons/33 tenir 48
SFX iB partenir partiendrez/34 tenir 49
SFX iB partenir partiendront/43 tenir 50
SFX iB partenir partiendrais/31 tenir 51
SFX iB partenir partiendrais/32 tenir 52
SFX iB partenir partiendrait/32 tenir 53
SFX iB partenir partiendrions/33 tenir 54
SFX iB partenir partiendriez/34 tenir 55
SFX iB partenir partiendraient/43 tenir 56
SFX iB partenir partienne/31 tenir 57
SFX iB partenir partiennes/32 tenir 58
SFX iB partenir partienne/32 tenir 59
SFX iB partenir partenions/33 tenir 60
SFX iB partenir parteniez/34 tenir 61
SFX iB partenir partiennent/43 tenir 62
SFX iB partenir partinsse/31 tenir 63
SFX iB partenir partinsses/32 tenir 64
SFX iB partenir partînt/32 tenir 65
SFX iB partenir partinssions/33 tenir 66
SFX iB partenir partinssiez/34 tenir 67
SFX iB partenir partinssent/43 tenir 68
SFX iB partenir partiens/32 tenir 69
SFX iB partenir partenons/15 tenir 70
SFX iB partenir partenez/34 tenir 71

SFX iC Y 51
SFX iC rir rir/16 [vf]rir 21
SFX iC rir rant/17 [vf]rir 22
SFX iC rir ert/41 [vf]rir 23
SFX iC rir erts/41 [vf]rir 24
SFX iC rir erte/41 [vf]rir 25
SFX iC rir ertes/41 [vf]rir 26
SFX iC rir re/9 [vf]rir 27
SFX iC rir res/5 [vf]rir 28
SFX iC rir re/17 [vf]rir 29
SFX iC rir rons/7 [vf]rir 30
SFX iC rir rez/8 [vf]rir 31
SFX iC rir rent/17 [vf]rir 32
SFX iC rir rais/9 [vf]rir 33
SFX iC rir rais/5 [vf]rir 34
SFX iC rir rait/17 [vf]rir 35
SFX iC rir rions/7 [vf]rir 36
SFX iC rir riez/8 [vf]rir 37
SFX iC rir raient/17 [vf]rir 38
SFX iC rir ris/9 [vf]rir 39
SFX iC rir ris/5 [vf]rir 40
SFX iC rir rit/17 [vf]rir 41
SFX iC rir rîmes/7 [vf]rir 42
SFX iC rir rîtes/8 [vf]rir 43
SFX iC rir rirent/17 [vf]rir 44
SFX iC rir rirai/9 [vf]rir 45
SFX iC rir riras/5 [vf]rir 46
SFX iC rir rira/17 [vf]rir 47
SFX iC rir rirons/7 [vf]rir 48
SFX iC rir rirez/8 [vf]rir 49
SFX iC rir riront/17 [vf]rir 50
SFX iC rir rirais/9 [vf]rir 51
SFX iC rir rirais/5 [vf]rir 52
SFX iC rir rirait/17 [vf]rir 53
SFX iC rir ririons/7 [vf]rir 54
SFX iC rir ririez/8 [vf]rir 55
SFX iC rir riraient/17 [vf]rir 56
SFX iC rir re/11 [vf]rir 57
SFX iC rir res/12 [vf]rir 58
SFX iC rir re/23 [vf]rir 59
SFX iC rir rions/13 [vf]rir 60
SFX iC rir riez/14 [vf]rir 61
SFX iC rir rent/17 [vf]rir 62
SFX iC rir risse/9 [vf]rir 63
SFX iC rir risses/5 [vf]rir 64
SFX iC rir rît/17 [vf]rir 65
SFX iC rir rissions/7 [vf]rir 66
SFX iC rir rissiez/8 [vf]rir 67
SFX iC rir rissent/17 [vf]rir 68
SFX iC rir re/12 [vf]rir 69
SFX iC rir rons/24 [vf]rir 70
SFX iC rir rez/14 [vf]rir 71

SFX iD Y 51
SFX iD courir courir/19 courir 21
SFX iD courir courant/20 courir 22
SFX iD courir couru courir 23
SFX iD courir courus courir 24
SFX iD courir courue courir 25
SFX iD courir courues courir 26
SFX iD courir cours/21 courir 27
SFX iD courir cours/15 courir 28
SFX iD courir court/15 courir 29
SFX iD courir courons/15 courir 30
SFX iD courir courez/15 courir 31
SFX iD courir courent/15 courir 32
SFX iD courir courais/21 courir 33
SFX iD courir courais/15 courir 34
SFX iD courir courait/15 courir 35
SFX iD courir courions/15 courir 36
SFX iD courir couriez/15 courir 37
SFX iD courir couraient/15 courir 38
SFX iD courir courus/21 courir 39
SFX iD courir courus/15 courir 40
SFX iD courir courut/15 courir 41
SFX iD courir courûmes/15 courir 42
SFX iD courir courûtes/15 courir 43
SFX iD courir coururent/15 courir 44
SFX iD courir courrai/21 courir 45
SFX iD courir courras/15 courir 46
SFX iD courir courra/15 courir 47
SFX iD courir courrons/15 courir 48
SFX iD courir courrez/15 courir 49
SFX iD courir courront/15 courir 50
SFX iD courir courrais/21 courir 51
SFX iD courir courrais/15 courir 52
SFX iD courir courrait/15 courir 53
SFX iD courir courrions/15 courir 54
SFX iD courir courriez/15 courir 55
SFX iD courir courraient/15 courir 56
SFX iD courir coure/21 courir 57
SFX iD courir coures/15 courir 58
SFX iD courir coure/15 courir 59
SFX iD courir courions/15 courir 60
SFX iD courir couriez/15 courir 61
SFX iD courir courent/15 courir 62
SFX iD courir courusse/21 courir 63
SFX iD courir courusses/15 courir 64
SFX iD courir courût/15 courir 65
SFX iD courir courussions/15 courir 66
SFX iD courir courussiez/15 courir 67
SFX iD courir courussent/15 courir 68
SFX iD courir cours/15 courir 69
SFX iD courir courons/15 courir 70
SFX iD courir courez/15 courir 71

SFX iE Y 51
SFX iE ourir ourir/44 courir 21
SFX iE ourir ourant/20 courir 22
SFX iE ourir ouru/41 courir 23
SFX iE ourir ourus/41 courir 24
SFX iE ourir ourue/41 courir 25
SFX iE ourir ourues/41 courir 26
SFX iE ourir ours/45 courir 27
SFX iE ourir ours/46 courir 28
SFX iE ourir ourt/46 courir 29
SFX iE ourir ourons/46 courir 30
SFX iE ourir ourez/46 courir 31
SFX iE ourir ourent/46 courir 32
SFX iE ourir ourais/45 courir 33
SFX iE ourir ourais/46 courir 34
SFX iE ourir ourait/46 courir 35
SFX iE ourir ourions/46 courir 36
SFX iE ourir ouriez/46 courir 37
SFX iE ourir ouraient/46 courir 38
SFX iE ourir ourus/45 courir 39
SFX iE ourir ourus/46 courir 40
SFX iE ourir ourut/46 courir 41
SFX iE ourir ourûmes/46 courir 42
SFX iE ourir ourûtes/46 courir 43
SFX iE ourir oururent/46 courir 44
SFX iE ourir ourrai/45 courir 45
SFX iE ourir ourras/46 courir 46
SFX iE ourir ourra/46 courir 47
SFX iE ourir ourrons/46 courir 48
SFX iE ourir ourrez/46 courir 49
SFX iE ourir ourront/46 courir 50
SFX iE ourir ourrais/45 courir 51
SFX iE ourir ourrais/46 courir 52
SFX iE ourir ourrait/46 courir 53
SFX iE ourir ourrions/46 courir 54
SFX iE ourir ourriez/46 courir 55
SFX iE ourir ourraient/46 courir 56
SFX iE ourir oure/45 courir 57
SFX iE ourir oures/46 courir 58
SFX iE ourir oure/46 courir 59
SFX iE ourir ourions/46 courir 60
SFX iE ourir ouriez/46 courir 61
SFX iE ourir ourent/46 courir 62
SFX iE ourir ourusse/45 courir 63
SFX iE ourir ourusses/46 courir 64
SFX iE ourir ourût/46 courir 65
SFX iE ourir ourussions/46 courir 66
SFX iE ourir ourussiez/46 courir 67
SFX iE ourir ourussent/46 courir 68
SFX iE ourir ours/24 courir 69
SFX iE ourir ourons/24 courir 70
SFX iE ourir ourez/24 courir 71

SFX iF N 51
SFX iF ervir ervir servir 21
SFX iF ervir ervant servir 22
SFX iF ervir ervi servir 23
SFX iF ervir ervis servir 24
SFX iF ervir ervie servir 25
SFX iF ervir ervies servir 26
SFX iF ervir ers servir 27
SFX iF ervir ers servir 28
SFX iF ervir ert servir 29
SFX iF ervir ervons servir 30
SFX iF ervir ervez servir 31
SFX iF ervir ervent servir 32
SFX iF ervir ervais servir 33
SFX iF ervir ervais servir 34
SFX iF ervir ervait servir 35
SFX iF ervir ervions servir 36
SFX iF ervir erviez servir 37
SFX iF ervir ervaient servir 38
SFX iF ervir ervis servir 39
SFX iF ervir ervis servir 40
SFX iF ervir ervit servir 41
SFX iF ervir ervîmes servir 42
SFX iF ervir ervîtes servir 43
SFX iF ervir ervirent servir 44
SFX iF ervir ervirai servir 45
SFX iF ervir erviras servir 46
SFX iF ervir ervira servir 47
SFX iF ervir ervirons servir 48
SFX iF ervir ervirez servir 49
SFX iF ervir erviront servir 50
SFX iF ervir ervirais servir 51
SFX iF ervir ervirais servir 52
SFX iF ervir ervirait servir 53
SFX iF ervir ervirions servir 54
SFX iF ervir erviriez servir 55
SFX iF ervir erviraient servir 56
SFX iF ervir erve servir 57
SFX iF ervir erves servir 58
SFX iF ervir erve servir 59
SFX iF ervir ervions servir 60
SFX iF ervir erviez servir 61
SFX iF ervir ervent servir 62
SFX iF ervir ervisse servir 63
SFX iF ervir ervisses servir 64
SFX iF ervir ervît servir 65
SFX iF ervir ervissions servir 66
SFX iF ervir ervissiez servir 67
SFX iF ervir ervissent servir 68
SFX iF ervir ers servir 69
SFX iF ervir ervons servir 70
SFX iF ervir ervez servir 71

SFX iG N 51
SFX iG êtir êtir vêtir 21
SFX iG êtir êtant vêtir 22
SFX iG êtir êtu vêtir 23
SFX iG êtir êtus vêtir 24
SFX iG êtir êtue vêtir 25
SFX iG êtir êtues vêtir 26
SFX iG êtir êts vêtir 27
SFX iG êtir êts vêtir 28
SFX iG êtir êt vêtir 29
SFX iG êtir êtons vêtir 30
SFX iG êtir êtez vêtir 31
SFX iG êtir êtont vêtir 32
SFX iG êtir êtais vêtir 33
SFX iG êtir êtais vêtir 34
SFX iG êtir êtait vêtir 35
SFX iG êtir êtions vêtir 36
SFX iG êtir êtiez vêtir 37
SFX iG êtir êtaient vêtir 38
SFX iG êtir êtis vêtir 39
SFX iG êtir êtis vêtir 40
SFX iG êtir êtit vêtir 41
SFX iG êtir êtîmes vêtir 42
SFX iG êtir êtîtes vêtir 43
SFX iG êtir êtirent vêtir 44
SFX iG êtir êtirai vêtir 45
SFX iG êtir êtiras vêtir 46
SFX iG êtir êtira vêtir 47
SFX iG êtir êtirons vêtir 48
SFX iG êtir êtirez vêtir 49
SFX iG êtir êtiront vêtir 50
SFX iG êtir êtirais vêtir 51
SFX iG êtir êtirais vêtir 52
SFX iG êtir êtirait vêtir 53
SFX iG êtir êtirions vêtir 54
SFX iG êtir êtiriez vêtir 55
SFX iG êtir êtiraient vêtir 56
SFX iG êtir ête vêtir 57
SFX iG êtir êtes vêtir 58
SFX iG êtir ête vêtir 59
SFX iG êtir êtions vêtir 60
SFX iG êtir êtiez vêtir 61
SFX iG êtir êtent vêtir 62
SFX iG êtir êtisse vêtir 63
SFX iG êtir êtisses vêtir 64
SFX iG êtir êtît vêtir 65
SFX iG êtir êtissions vêtir 66
SFX iG êtir êtissiez vêtir 67
SFX iG êtir êtissent vêtir 68
SFX iG êtir êts vêtir 69
SFX iG êtir êtons vêtir 70
SFX iG êtir êtez vêtir 71

SFX iI N 48
SFX iI ormir ormir dormir 21
SFX iI ormir ormant dormir 22
SFX iI ormir ormi dormir 72
SFX iI ormir ors dormir 27
SFX iI ormir ors dormir 28
SFX iI ormir ort dormir 29
SFX iI ormir ormons dormir 30
SFX iI ormir ormez dormir 31
SFX iI ormir orment dormir 32
SFX iI ormir ormais dormir 33
SFX iI ormir ormais dormir 34
SFX iI ormir ormait dormir 35
SFX iI ormir ormions dormir 36
SFX iI ormir ormiez dormir 37
SFX iI ormir ormaient dormir 38
SFX iI ormir ormis dormir 39
SFX iI ormir ormis dormir 40
SFX iI ormir ormit dormir 41
SFX iI ormir ormîmes dormir 42
SFX iI ormir ormîtes dormir 43
SFX iI ormir ormirent dormir 44
SFX iI ormir ormirai dormir 45
SFX iI ormir ormiras dormir 46
SFX iI ormir ormira dormir 47
SFX iI ormir ormirons dormir 48
SFX iI ormir ormirez dormir 49
SFX iI ormir ormiront dormir 50
SFX iI ormir ormirais dormir 51
SFX iI ormir ormirais dormir 52
SFX iI ormir ormirait dormir 53
SFX iI ormir ormirions dormir 54
SFX iI ormir ormiriez dormir 55
SFX iI ormir ormiraient dormir 56
SFX iI ormir orme dormir 57
SFX iI ormir ormes dormir 58
SFX iI ormir orme dormir 59
SFX iI ormir ormions dormir 60
SFX iI ormir ormiez dormir 61
SFX iI ormir orment dormir 62
SFX iI ormir ormisse dormir 63
SFX iI ormir ormisses dormir 64
SFX iI ormir ormît dormir 65
SFX iI ormir ormissions dormir 66
SFX iI ormir ormissiez dormir 67
SFX iI ormir ormissent dormir 68
SFX iI ormir ors dormir 69
SFX iI ormir ormons dormir 70
SFX iI ormir ormez dormir 71
